Utah statutes.
76-1-601.   Definitions.
Unless otherwise provided, the following terms apply to this title:
(1)  "Act" means a voluntary bodily movement and includes speech.
(2)  "Actor" means a person whose criminal responsibility is in issue in a
criminal action.
(3)  "Bodily injury" means physical pain, illness, or any impairment of
physical condition.
(4)  "Conduct" means an act or omission.
(5)  "Dangerous weapon" means:
(a)  any item capable of causing death or serious bodily injury; or
(b)  a facsimile or representation of the item, if:
(i)  the actor's use or apparent intended use of the item leads the victim to
reasonably believe the item is likely to cause death or serious bodily injury;
or
(ii)  the actor represents to the victim verbally or in any other manner that
he is in control of such an item.
(6)  "Grievous sexual offense" means:
(a)  rape, Section 76-5-402;
(b)  rape of a child, Section 76-5-402.1;
(c)  object rape, Section 76-5-402.2;
(d)  object rape of a child, Section 76-5-402.3;
(e)  forcible sodomy, Subsection 76-5-403(2);
(f)  sodomy on a child, Section 76-5-403.1;
(g)  aggravated sexual abuse of a child, Subsection 76-5-404.1(4);
(h)  aggravated sexual assault, Section 76-5-405;
(i)  any felony attempt to commit an offense described in Subsections (6)(a)
through (h); or
(j)  an offense in another state, territory, or district of the United States
that, if committed in Utah, would constitute an offense described in
Subsections (6)(a) through (i).
(7)  "Offense" means a violation of any penal statute of this state.
(8)  "Omission" means a failure to act when there is a legal duty to act and
the actor is capable of acting.
(9)  "Person" means an individual, public or private corporation, government,
partnership, or unincorporated association.
(10)  "Possess" means to have physical possession of or to exercise dominion
or control over tangible property.
(11)  "Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury that creates or causes
serious permanent disfigurement, protracted loss or impairment of the function
of any bodily member or organ, or creates a substantial risk of death.
(12)  "Substantial bodily injury" means bodily injury, not amounting to
serious bodily injury, that creates or causes protracted physical pain,
temporary disfigurement, or temporary loss or impairment of the function of
any bodily member or organ.
(13)  "Writing" or "written" includes any handwriting, typewriting, printing,
electronic storage or transmission, or any other method of recording
information or fixing information in a form capable of being preserved.
